Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202668-1006
Assistance to the aged, blind, or disabled; amount authorized per person.

The amount of assistance to the aged, blind, or disabled shall be based on the need of the individual and the circumstances existing in each case. When permitted by the federal old age and survivors insurance act, any accumulations of increased benefits under such act may be disregarded when determining need.

Laws 1965, c. 395, § 6, p. 1266;

Laws 1965, c. 397, § 2, p. 1277;

Laws 1967, c. 410, § 1, p. 1274;

Laws 1969, c. 535, § 2, p. 2180;

Laws 2026, LB867, § 10.
July 18, 2026